North Carolina, session 2025, HB313.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of eighty-eight million three hundred ninety-five thousand
dollars ($88,395,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed
grant to Madison County to be used as follows:
(1) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for repairs at the Marshall
Wastewater Treatment Plant.
(2) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) for repairs to the Marshall Town Hall.
(3) One million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000) to rebuild the Marshall
Housing Authority Apartments.
(4) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for repairs to the
Marshall Volunteer Fire Department.
(5) Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for repairs to the Hot Springs Town
Hall.
(6) Twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) to build a new facility for the Hot
Springs Wastewater Treatment Plant.
(7) Six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) for repairs to the Hot Springs
Community Center.
(8) Two hundred seventy thousand dollars ($270,000) for repairs to the Hot
Springs Library.
(9) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for temporary relocation of Town
departments housed in the Sprinkle Shelton Building.
(10) Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for repairs to Barnard Park.
(11) Two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) for repairs to the Hot
Springs Housing Authority Wastewater Treatment Facility.
(12) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for repairs to the French Broad
River, Ivy River, and Additional County Tributaries and Waterways,
including debris removal.
(13) Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for repairs to the County's
Communications Tower at Duckett Top.
(14) Nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) to complete the upgrades to the NC
Emergency Communication Towers.
*H313-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(15) Six million two hundred thousand dollars ($6,200,000) for assistance in the
design/build of an E-911 and Emergency Operations Facility.
(16) Four million nine hundred thousand dollars ($4,900,000) for assistance in the
design/build of an ambulance and medical personnel facility in the Town of
Marshall.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 313-First Edition